Utah statutes.
75-3-307.   Informal appointment proceedings -- Delay in order -- Duty of
registrar -- Effect of appointment.
(1) After receipt of an application for informal appointment of a personal
representative other than a special administrator as provided in Section
75-3-614, the registrar, after making the findings required by Section
75-3-308, shall appoint the applicant subject to qualification and acceptance,
if at least ten days have elapsed since the date of the notice required by
Section 75-3-310, or if at least 120 hours have elapsed since the decedent's
death and all persons entitled to notice under Section 75-3-310 have waived
this notice in writing; but if the decedent was a nonresident, the registrar
shall delay the order of appointment until thirty days have elapsed since
death unless the personal representative appointed at the decedent's domicile
is the applicant, or unless the decedent's will directs that his estate be
subject to the laws of this state.
(2)  The status of personal representative and the powers and duties
pertaining to the office are fully established by informal appointment. An
appointment, and the office of personal representative created by it, is
subject to termination as provided in Sections 75-3-608 through 75-3-612, but
is not subject to retroactive vacation.
